Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.195.020

Private schools—Rights recognized.

The state recognizes the following rights of every private school:

(1) To teach their religious beliefs and doctrines, if any; to pray in class and in assemblies; to teach patriotism including requiring students to salute the flag of the United States if that be the custom of the particular private school.

(2) To require that there shall be on file the written consent of parents or guardians of students prior to the administration of any psychological test or the conduct of any type of group therapy.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 215 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.02.220.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 215: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 215 s 8.]